src/import/nouns.lexc
taksosõit+N:takso#s´õit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
taksoteenus+N:takso#teenus SOOLANE ;
taksoturg+N:takso#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@takt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´akt TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taktik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taktik VIRSIK ;
taktika+N:taktika AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taktilisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taktilisus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taktitundelisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@takti#t´undelisus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taktitundetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@takti#t´undetus OLULINE ;
taktitunne+N:takti#t´unD1e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taktitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taktitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@takutis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@takutis OLULINE ;
takutoristaja+N:taku#toristaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@takutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@takutus OLULINE ;
tala+N:tala KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talaar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal´aar TAUD ;
talastik+N:t`alast´ik ELANIK ;
talb+N:t´alB2%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tald+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´alD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taldmik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aldm´ik ÄMBLIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taldrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taldrik VIRSIK ;
taldrikutäis+N:taldriku#t´äiS1%{stemill%} VARS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talendipuudus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal`en,di#p´uudus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal´en,t TAUD ;
talgud+N:t´algu AASTA ;
talguline+N:t´alguline OLULINE ;
tali+N:tal,i KAVA ;
talirukis+N:tal,i#r´ukK1i%{stemill%}%{rare%} KOTKAS ;
talisibul+N:tal,i#sibul MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talisman+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talisman TAUD ;
talisporditreener+N:tal,i#spordi#tr´eener REDEL ;
talisport+N:tal,i#sp´ort TAUD ;
talitaja+N:talitaja AASTA ;
talitee+N:tal,i#t´ee%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talitlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talitlus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talitsematus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal,itsematus SUULINE ;
talitsiitsitaja+N:tal,i#tsiitsitaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talitus OLULINE ;
talje+N:tal,je PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´al,k TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tall+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´al,l TAUD ;
tall+N:t´all%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
tallalakkuja+N:talla#l´akkuja AASTA ;
tallalaud+N:talla#l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
tallamine+N:t´allamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tallats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tallats REDEL ;
tallermaa+N:taller#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talletus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talletus OLULINE ;
talletuskoht+N:talletus#k´ohT1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
tallimees+N:tal,li#me MEES ;
tallinlane+N:t´al,linlane OLULINE ;
tallinlanna+N:t´al,linlanna PERE ;
tallipoiss+N:tal,li#p´oiss POISS ;
tallmeister+N:t´all#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
tallukas+N:talluka LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tallus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´allus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tallutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tallutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talmud+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talmud REDEL ;
talmudism+N:talmud´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talmudist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talmud´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talong+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal´ong TAUD ;
talrep+N:t´alr´ep KABINET ;
taltsutaja+N:taltsutaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taltsutamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taltsutamatus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taltsutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taltsutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taltumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´altumus OLULINE ;
talu+N:talu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
taluhoone+N:talu#h´oone PINGE ;
taluinimene+N:talu#inimene OLULINE ;
taluke+N:taluke PEENIKE ;
talukoht+N:talu#k´ohT1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
taluliit+N:talu#l´iit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
talumaa+N:talu#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
talumaja+N:talu#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
talumajand+N:talu#majand REDEL ;
talumajapidamine+N:talu#maja#pidamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talumatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talumatus SUULINE ;
talumees+N:talu#me MEES ;
talunaine+N:talu#naine NAINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talund+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talund REDEL ;
talunik+N:t`alun´ik ELANIK ;
taluomanik+N:talu#`oman´ik ELANIK ;
talupere+N:talu#pere%{stemill%} PERE ;
taluperemees+N:talu#pere#me MEES ;
taluperepäev+N:talu#pere#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talupidaja+N:talu#pidaja AASTA ;
talupidamine+N:talu#pidamine OLULINE ;
talupoeg+N:talu#p´oE4G1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
talupoegkond+N:talu#p´oegk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talupoja-seisus+N:talu#poja-s´eisus SUULINE ;
talupäev+N:talu#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talurahvamuuseum+N:talu#r´ahva#m´uuseum MUUSEUM ;
talurahvas+N:talu#r´ahva KOTKAS ;
talutaja+N:talutaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talutavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talutavus SUULINE ;
taluturg+N:talu#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talutus OLULINE ;
talutöö+N:talu#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taluvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@taluvus SUULINE ;
taluõu+N:talu#´õu EIT ;
talv+N:t´al, TALV ;
talveaed+N:talve#´a AED ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talvekindlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@talve#k´indlus SUULINE ;
talvekuu+N:talve#k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
talvekülm+N:talve#k´ülm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
talvepuu+N:talve#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
talvepäev+N:talve#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talvetaat+N:talve#t´aat, TAUD ;
talveuni+N:talve#un,%{stemill%} MERI ;
talveõhtu+N:talve#´õhtu AASTA ;
talveöö+N:talve#´ööH3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talvik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal,vik VIRSIK ;
talvike+N:tal,vike PEENIKE ;
talvisted+N:talviste AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talvitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal,vitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@talõšš+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tal´õšš TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamarind+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tamar´ind TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamarisk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tamar´isk TAUD ;
tambits+N:tambits MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tambur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ambur REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamburiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t`ambur´iin TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tambuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tamb´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamiil+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tam´iil TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamil+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tamil REDEL ;
tamka+N:tamka PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´amm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´amm%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
tammeleht+N:tamme#l´ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
tammemets+N:tamme#m´ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
tammepuu+N:tamme#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
tammesalu+N:tamme#salu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tammik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tammik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Single@tammipealne+N:@P.Stem.Single@tammi#p´ealne SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tammistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tammistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´amp TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tampoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tamp´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tamtamm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tamt´amm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tandem+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´andem REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tander+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´andE2r REDEL ;
tandža+N:tandža PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tangens+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tangens REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tangid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ang TAUD ;
tango+N:tango PERE ;
tangud+N:t´ang%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
tangupuder+N:tangu#p´uT2E2r%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tanguut+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tang´uut TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tank+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ank FIAT ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tanker+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´anker REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tankett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tank´et,t TAUD ;
tankimisjaam+N:t´ankimis#j´aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tankist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tank´ist TAUD ;
tankitõrje+N:tanki#t´õrje PINGE ;
tankitõrjepüss+N:tanki#t´õrje#p´üs,s TAUD ;
tankla+N:t´ankla AASTA ;
tanksaabas+N:t´ank#s´aaP2a KOTKAS ;
tanner+N:tanD1E2r MANNER ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tanniin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tann´iin TAUD ;
tanta+N:tanta PERE ;
tante+N:tante PERE ;
tantsija+N:t´an,tsija AASTA ;
tantsijanna+N:t´an,tsijanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsijatar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´an,tsijatar TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsisklus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tan,tsisklus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tan,tsitus OLULINE ;
tantstõbi+N:t´ants#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tantsuetendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@tantsu#etendus OLULINE ;
tantsumees+N:tantsu#me MEES ;
tantsumuusika+N:tantsu#muusika AASTA ;
tantsunumber+N:tantsu#n´umbE2r REDEL ;
tantsupidu+N:tantsu#piD1u KAVA ;
tantsupoiss+N:tantsu#p´oiss POISS ;
tantsupõrand+N:tantsu#põrand MAGUS ;
tantsusaal+N:tantsu#s´aal, TAUD ;
tantsusamm+N:tantsu#s´amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
tantsustiil+N:tantsu#st´iil TAUD ;
tantsutrall+N:tantsu#tr´al,l TAUD ;
tantsutrupp+N:tantsu#tr´upp TAUD ;
tantsuõhtu+N:tantsu#´õhtu AASTA ;
tantsuõpetaja+N:tantsu#õpetaja AASTA ;
tanu+N:tanu KAVA ;
tanulane+N:tanulane OLULINE ;
tanum+N:tanum MAGUS ;
taoism+N:tao´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taolisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aolisus OLULINE ;
taosed+N:t´aos SOOLANE ;
taotleja+N:t´aotleja AASTA ;
taotlemine+N:t´aotlemine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taotlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aotlus SUULINE ;
tapalane+N:tapalane OLULINE ;
tapalanna+N:tapalanna PERE ;
tapamaja+N:tapa#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
tapariist+N:tapa#r´iist%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
tapatalgud+N:tapa#t´algu AASTA ;
